src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
айыртемӹнок+Adv:айыртемӹнок ADV_  "erityisesti" ;
активнын+Adv:активнын ADV_  "" ;
андак+Adv:андак ADV-TEMP_  "ajoissa" ;
анзыкы+Adv:анзыкы ADV_  "eteen" ;
анзылны+Adv:анзылны ADV_  "edessä" ;
араван+Adv:араван ADV_  "kärryillä" ;
артеллӓ+Adv:артеллӓ ADV_  "" ;
вадны+Adv:вадны ADV_  "yöllä" ;
вадышен+Adv:вадышен ADV_  "illasta alkaen" ;
варарак+Adv:варарак ADV_  "myöhemmin" ;
ваштарешлӓ+Adv:ваштарешлӓ ADV_  "päinvastoin" ;
велнӹ+Adv:велнӹ ADV_  "puolella" ;
веси+Adv:веси ADV_  "ensi vuonna" ;
вик+Adv:вик ADV_  "suoraan" ;
вишкӹдӹ+Adv:вишкӹдӹ ADV_  "" ;
воктен+Adv:воктен ADV_  "lähellä" ;
вуйге-пачге+Adv:вуйге-пачге ADV_  "" ;
вуйын-вуйстык+Adv:вуйын-вуйстык ADV_  "pää alaspäin" ;
вуя+Adv:вуя POSTP_  "-päin" ;
вуя-вӓшӓ+Adv:вуя-вӓшӓ ADV_  "kädestä suuhun" ;
выльге+Adv:выльге ADV_  "" ;
выртын+Adv:выртын ADV_  "hetkellä" ;
вӓре+Adv:вӓре ADV_  "paikassa" ;
вӓре-вӓре+Adv:вӓре-вӓре ADV_  "paikkoittain" ;
вӓш+Adv:вӓш ADV_  "toisilleen" ;
вӓшӓ-вӓшӓ+Adv:вӓшӓ-вӓшӓ ADV_  "toinen toista vastavuoroisesti" ;
вӹкӹ-вӹкӹ+Adv:вӹкӹ-вӹкӹ ADV_  "päällekkäin" ;
вӹлнӹ+Adv:вӹлнӹ ADV_  "päällä" ;
вӹрвузык+Adv:вӹрвузык ADV_  "vuodatusveressä" ;
жепеш+Adv:жепеш ADV_  "väliaikaisesti" ;
жепӹштӹ+Adv:жепӹштӹ ADV_  "ajoissa" ;
изин+Adv:изин ADV_  "" ;
изинек-когонек+Adv:изинек-когонек ADV_  "" ;
иквӓреш+Adv:иквӓреш ADV_  "yhdessä" ;
икладын+Adv:икладын ADV_  "" ;
икманярын+Adv:икманярын ADV_  "muutaman ihmisen voimin" ;
иксольы+Adv:иксольы ADV_  "samalla" ;
иктӓ% вес% гӓнӓ+Adv:иктӓ-гӓнӓ ADV_  "joku toinen kerta" ;
иктӓ-кыш+Adv:иктӓ-кыш ADV_  "jonnekin" ;
иктӓ-мазар+Adv:иктӓ-мазар ADV_  "" ;
иктӓ-семӹнь+Adv:иктӓ-семӹнь ADV_  "jotenkin" ;
иктӹн+Adv:иктӹн ADV_  "yksitellen" ;
икуэш+Adv:икуэш ADV_  "" ;
икӓнӓ-ик-монгырыш+Adv:икӓнӓ-ик-монгырыш ADV_  "" ;
имешшен+Adv:имешшен ADV_  "viime vuodesta alkaen" ;
ирвекӹ+Adv:ирвекӹ ADV_  "itään" ;
ирвец+Adv:ирвец ADV_  "idän puolelta" ;
ирен+Adv:ирен ADV_  "puhtaasti" ;
ирок+Adv:ирок ADV_  "aamulla" ;
ирсӓ+Adv:ирсӓ ADV_  "" ;
йишелӓ+Adv:йишелӓ ADV_  "" ;
йолт+Adv:йолт ADV_  "kirkkaasti" ;
йонгатан+Adv:йонгатан ADV_  "" ;
йочырге+Adv:йочырге ADV_  "" ;
йывырген+Adv:йывырген ADV_  "" ;
йыгырге+Adv:йыгырге ADV_  "" ;
йыдпелвелӓн+Adv:йыдпелвелӓн ADV_  "pohjoiseen" ;
йыдпелӹм+Adv:йыдпелӹн ADV_  "keskiyöllä" ;
йыксыр+Adv:йыксыр ADV_  "" ;
йышт+Adv:йышт ADV_  "vaivihkaa" ;
йӹвӹжӓн+Adv:йӹвӹжӓн ADV_  "hellästi" ;
йӹгӹре+Adv:йӹгӹре ADV_  "vieressä" ;
йӹлмӓ-вӓш+Adv:йӹлмӓ-вӓш ADV_  "kahden kesken" ;
йӹлт+Adv:цӹлт ADV_  "kokonaan" ;
йӹрвек+Adv:йӹрвек ADV_  "" ;
йӹрӹм-вӓш+Adv:йӹрӹм-вӓш ADV_  "ympäriinsä" ;
кавырын+Adv:кавырын ADV_  "" ;
капкылок+Adv:капкылок ADV_  "nopeasti" ;
келгӹн+Adv:келгӹн ADV_  "syvästi" ;
керек-кышак+Adv:керек-кышак ADV_  "mihin tahansa" ;
керек-маняр+Adv:керек-маняр ADV_  "miten paljon tahansa" ;
кечӹвӓлвекӹлӓ+Adv:кечӹвӓлвекӹлӓ ADV_  "eteläänpäin" ;
кечӹвӓлвец+Adv:кечӹвӓлвецӹн ADV_  "etelästä" ;
кечӹгыт+Adv:кечӹгыт ADV_  "" ;
кидӓ+Adv:кидӓ ADV_  "käsin" ;
ковыжге+Adv:ковыжге ADV_  "" ;
когонек+Adv:когонек ADV_  "" ;
коктын+Adv:коктын ADV_  "kahdestaan" ;
конечно+Adv:конечно ADV_  "toki" ;
кочырге+Adv:кочырге ADV_  "" ;
кудытын+Adv:кудытын ADV_  "kuudestaan" ;
курым-курымок+Adv:курым-курымок ADV_  "" ;
куштылгын+Adv:куштылгын ADV_  "kevyesti" ;
кыды-кынар+Adv:кыды-кынар ADV_  "" ;
кыжакен+Adv:кыжакен ADV_  "" ;
кымдан+Adv:кымдан ADV_  "leveästi" ;
кымык+Adv:кымык ADV_  "kumollaan" ;
кынам-гӹнят+Adv:кынам-гӹнят ADV_  "milloin tahansa" ;
кынамшен+Adv:кынамшен ADV_  "" ;
кынары+Adv:кынары ADV_  "paljonko" ;
кытлан+Adv:кытлан ADV_  "" ;
кытын-тореш+Adv:кытын-тореш ADV_  "" ;
кыце-ӓнят+Adv:кыце-ӓнят ADV_  "" ;
кыш+Adv:кыш ADV_  "mihin" ;
кышак-тишӓк+Adv:кышак-тишӓк ADV_  "" ;
кышакен-гӹнят+Adv:кышакен-гӹнят ADV_  "" ;
кышец-шон+Adv:кышец-шон ADV_  "" ;
кышкевек-гӹнят+Adv:кышкевек-гӹнят ADV_  "" ;
кышкы-гӹнят+Adv:кышкы-гӹнят ADV_  "" ;
кышкыла+Adv:кышкыла ADV_  "mihin suuntaan" ;
кышты-тиштӹ+Adv:кышты-тиштӹ ADV_  "siellä täällä" ;
кӓнгӹжшен+Adv:кӓнгӹжшен ADV_  "kesästä alkaen" ;
кӓньӹл+Adv:кӓньӹл ADV_  "" ;
кӓсӹрӹн+Adv:кӓсӹрӹн ADV_  "" ;
кӱсӹлӓ+Adv:кӱсӹлӓ ADV_  "lainaksi" ;
кӱшкӹлӓ+Adv:кӱшкӹлӓ ADV_  "ylöspäin" ;
кӱшӹцӹн+Adv:кӱшӹцӹн ADV_  "korkealta" ;
кӹзӹток+Adv:кӹзӹток ADV_  "heti" ;
кӹткӓн+Adv:кӹткӓн ADV_  "" ;
ладнан+Adv:ладнан ADV_  "rauhallisesti" ;
лачок+Adv:лачок ADV_  "oikeasti" ;
лешӓнгӹшен+Adv:лешӓнгӹшен ADV_  "ammoisesta ajasta" ;
лишкӹ+Adv:лишкӹ ADV_  "lähelle" ;
логӹц+Adv:логӹц ADV_  "joukosta" ;
лочыге+Adv:лочыге ADV_  "" ;
лучи+Adv:лучи ADV_  "paremmin" ;
лыжге+Adv:лыжге ADV_  "rauhallisesti" ;
лыпыстке+Adv:лыпыстке ADV_  "" ;
лӱдӹшлӓ+Adv:лӱдӹшлӓ ADV_  "pelottavasti" ;
лӹвецӹн+Adv:лӹвецӹн ADV_  "alta" ;
лӹвӓлнӹ+Adv:лӹвӓлнӹ ADV_  "alla" ;
лӹмлӓн+Adv:лӹмлӓн ADV_  "nimeäkseen" ;
мааш+Adv:мааш ADV_  "minkä verran" ;
мазар-гӹнят+Adv:мазар-гӹнят ADV_  "riittävästi" ;
мазарын+Adv:мазарын ADV_  "kuinka paljon" ;
малан-ӓнят+Adv:малан-ӓнят ADV_  "joksikin" ;
маняр-ӓнят+Adv:маняр-ӓнят ADV_  "kuinkahan paljon" ;
молнам+Adv:молнам ADV_  "aiemmin" ;
музырге+Adv:музырге ADV_  "" ;
мыктен+Adv:мыктен ADV_  "" ;
мыньырге+Adv:мыньырге ADV_  "" ;
мычец+Adv:мычец ADV_  "siitä syystä" ;
мычны+Adv:мыртны ADV_  "" ;
мӧкмӧк+Adv:мӧкмӧк ADV_  "kömpelösti" ;
мӹндӹркӹ+Adv:мӹндӹркӹ ADV_  "kauas" ;
мӹндӹрӓн+Adv:мӹндӹрӓн ADV_  "kauas" ;
наизусть+Adv:наизусть ADV_  "ulkoa" ;
незнай+Adv:незнай ADV_  "ihan sama" ;
нешкӹдӹ+Adv:нешкӹдӹ ADV_  "huonosti" ;
нигышак+Adv:нигышак ADV_  "ei mihinkään" ;
нигышты+Adv:нигышты ADV_  "missään" ;
ниманяр+Adv:ниманяр ADV_  "ei yhtään" ;
ньӹмешкӹ+Adv:ньӹмешкӹ ADV_  "toistaiseksi" ;
обязательно+Adv:обязательно ADV_  "on pakko" ;
остаткаэш+Adv:остаткаэш ADV_  "ihan viimeiseksi" ;
палан+Adv:палан ADV_  "kauas" ;
пачаш-пачаш+Adv:пачаш-пачаш ADV_  "" ;
пеле-лош+Adv:пеле-лош ADV_  "" ;
первишен+Adv:первишен ADV_  "" ;
поздан+Adv:поздан ADV_  "" ;
пораткан+Adv:пораткан ADV_  "" ;
пыйвек+Adv:пыйвек ADV_  "" ;
пышикеш+Adv:пышикеш ADV_  "" ;
пӹртӓри+Adv:пӹртӓри ADV_  "" ;
раш+Adv:раш ADV_  "" ;
рупок+Adv:рупок ADV_  "" ;
рӹмӹн+Adv:рӹмӹн ADV_  "" ;
сек+Adv:сек ADV_  "kaikkein" ;
скушнан+Adv:скушнан ADV_  "ikävystettävästi" ;
соок+Adv:соок ADV_  "aina" ;
сусун+Adv:сусун ADV_  "iloisesti" ;
тагачы+Adv:тагачы ADV_  "tänään" ;
тагыце-гӹнят+Adv:тагыце-гӹнят ADV_  "" ;
тагышец-гӹнят+Adv:тагышец-гӹнят ADV_  "" ;
тагышты-ӓнят+Adv:тагышты-ӓнят ADV_  "" ;
тамалан-гӹнят+Adv:тамалан-гӹнят ADV_  "" ;
таманяреш+Adv:таманяреш ADV_  "" ;
телӹм+Adv:телӹм ADV_  "" ;
тенгелӓ+Adv:тенгелӓ ADV_  "niinpä" ;
тилошты+Adv:тилошты ADV_  "" ;
тишец+Adv:тишец ADV_  "tästä" ;
тишӓк+Adv:тишӓк ADV_  "tänne" ;
токыжы+Adv:токыжы ADV_  "kotiinsa" ;
торан+Adv:торан ADV_  "" ;
трӱк+Adv:трӱк ADV_  "äkkia" ;
тупелӓ+Adv:тупелӓ ADV_  "" ;
туреш+Adv:туреш ADV_  "itsekseen" ;
тылтке+Adv:тылтке ADV_  "" ;
тырьге+Adv:тырьге ADV_  "" ;
тӧреш+Adv:тӧреш ADV_  "samalla viivalla" ;
тӱнгӹртке+Adv:тӱнгӹртке ADV_  "" ;
тӹвекӹлӓ+Adv:тӹвекӹлӓ ADV_  "sinnepäin" ;
тӹгытлаэш+Adv:тӹгытлаэш ADV_  "siihen kohtaan" ;
тӹнӓмеш+Adv:тӹнӓмеш ADV_  "siihen aikaan" ;
тӹрдон+Adv:тӹрдон ADV_  "" ;
тӹхӓлӓ+Adv:тӹхӓлӓ ADV_  "kokonaan" ;
тӹшкӹ-тишкӹ+Adv:тӹшкӹ-тишкӹ ADV_  "" ;
условно+Adv:условно ADV_  "" ;
уэш+Adv:уэш ADV_  "" ;
хоть-кышкы+Adv:хоть-кышкы ADV_  "" ;
хырге+Adv:хырге ADV_  "" ;
циц+Adv:циц ADV_  "" ;
цудыге+Adv:цудыге ADV_  "" ;
цуц-цуц+Adv:цуц-цуц ADV_  "" ;
цымыр+Adv:цымыр ADV_  "" ;
цӓрӓштӹ+Adv:цӓрӓштӹ ADV_  "" ;
цӹтен-цӹтӹде+Adv:цӹтен-цӹтӹде ADV_  "" ;
чоте+Adv:чоте ADV_  "" ;
чӹнгӹдӹ+Adv:чӹнгӹдӹ ADV_  "" ;
шалахайын+Adv:шалахайын ADV_  "" ;
шижӹн-шижде+Adv:шижӹн-шижде ADV_  "" ;
шошымеш+Adv:шошымеш ADV_  "" ;
шукердшен+Adv:шукердшен ADV_  "" ;
шытькыды+Adv:шытькыды ADV_  "" ;
шӱлӹкӹн+Adv:шӱлӹкӹн ADV_  "" ;
шӹнгӹнь+Adv:шӹнгӹнь ADV_  "taakse" ;
ымбацын+Adv:ымбацын ADV_  "etäältä" ;
ялт+Adv:ялт ADV_  "täysin" ;
яре-яре+Adv:яре-яре ADV_  "sekaisin" ;
ӓнят+Adv:ӓнят ADV_  "ehkä" ;
ӓнят-кышкы+Adv:ӓнят-кышкы ADV_  "ei tietoa mihin" ;
ӓнят-тамалын+Adv:ӓнят-тамалын ADV_  "jostain syystä" ;
ӧрдӹжӹш+Adv:ӧрдӹжӹш ADV_  "kauas pois" ;
ӱлӹкӹлӓ+Adv:ӱлӹкӹлӓ ADV_  "alaspäin" ;
ӹне+Adv:ӹне ADV_  "niisiis" ;
